pt-BR: Direção de ajuste de pH: Redutor de pH; Elevador de pH; Outro
en: pH adjustment direction: pH Down; pH Up; Other
vi: Hướng điều chỉnh độ pH: Giảm pH; Tăng pH; Khác
nb: pH-justeringsretning: pH ned; pH opp; Annet
sk-SK: Smer úpravy pH: Zníženie pH; Zvýšenie pH; Iné
ko: pH 조절 방향: pH 다운; pH 업; 기타
el: Κατεύθυνση ρύθμισης pH: pH μείωση; pH αύξηση; Άλλο
pl: Kierunek regulacji pH: Obniżanie pH; Podwyższanie pH; Pozostałe
ru: Направление корректировки pH: Снижение pH; Повышение pH; Другое
da: pH-justeringsretning: pH ned; pH op; Andet
fr: Correction du pH: Diminution du pH; Augmentation du pH; Autre
es: Dirección de ajuste del pH: Reducción del pH; Aumento del pH; Otros
zh-CN: 酸碱调节方向: 降低 pH; 升高 pH; 其他
hu: pH-beállítás iránya: pH-érték csökkentése; pH-érték emelése; Egyéb
ro-RO: Direcția de ajustare a pH-ului: Scădere pH; Creștere pH; Altele
ja: pH調整方向: pH下降; pH上昇; その他
sv: Riktning för pH-justering: pH-sänkare; pH-ökare; Övrigt
lt-LT: pH reguliavimo kryptis: pH mažiau; pH daugiau; Kita
th: ทิศทางการปรับค่า pH: ลดค่า pH; เพิ่มค่า pH; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Smjer podešavanja pH: Snižavanje pH vrijednosti; Povećavanje pH vrijednosti; Ostalo
tr: pH ayarlama yönü: pH Düşürücü; pH Yükseltici; Diğer
zh-TW: pH 值調節方向: pH 值下降; pH 值升高; 其他
sl-SI: Smer prilagajanja pH: Znižanje pH; pH navzgor; Druga
fi: pH-säätösuunta: pH-arvo laskee; pH-arvo nousee; Muu
de: Richtung der Anpassung des pH-Werts: pH-Wert senkend; pH-Wert erhöhend; Sonstiges
cs: Směr úpravy pH: Snížení (pH Down); Zvýšení (pH Up); Jiné
bg-BG: Посока на регулиране на pH: Намалено pH; Увеличено pH; Друго
it: Direzione di regolazione del pH: pH Down; pH Up; Altro
nl: Richting van pH-aanpassing: pH-verlager; pH-verhoger; Overig
pt-PT: Direção do ajuste do pH: pH baixo; pH alto; Outro